Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1766YH (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. 374 Section 1. Section 232.2, subsection 12, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. (1) All rights and duties of a custodian shall be 3 subject to any residual rights and duties remaining in a parent 4 or guardian. 5 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), the department may 6 consent to routine medical care for a child that will allow the 7 child to engage in normal childhood experiences and participate 8 in activities in a manner similar to the childâs peers. 9 âRoutine medical careâ includes but is not limited to all of the 10 following: 11 (a) Preventative care, also known as wellness care, not 12 including the administration of a vaccination. 13 (b) Nonemergency medical care including but not limited 14 to a physical examination, a diagnostic laboratory test, or a 15 medical visit for a minor illness. 16 (c) Use of necessary medication, including but not limited 17 to antibiotics. 18 Sec. 2. Section 232.2, subsection 12, Code 2025, is amended 19 by adding the following new paragraph: 20 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. If a court order entered under this 21 chapter transfers legal custody of a child to the department, 22 the department shall have the authority to delegate the 23 departmentâs rights and duties as custodian of the child to a 24 licensee under chapter 237. 25 Sec. 3. Section 237.10, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 26 by adding the following new paragraph: 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. The department shall notify an individual 28 licensee if the department delegates the departmentâs right 29 to consent to routine medical care on behalf of a child under 30 section 232.2, paragraph âcâ , to the individual licensee. 31